Utah statutes.
75-5a-105.   Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.
A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable
exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of
a minor under Section 75-5a-110.
